Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.097

Reimbursement for costs.

(1) The commission shall reimburse the director for necessary costs for services conducted on behalf of the commission under this chapter.

(2) The commission may enter into an agreement with the director to administer this chapter or chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2002 c 313 s 86.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.